Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 78. Rehabilitation and Liquidation.

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, § 93 et seq.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 157-177, 226-258.

Sec. 21.78.010.
Jurisdiction of delinquency proceedings.

The court is vested with exclusive original jurisdiction of delinquency proceedings under this chapter, and is authorized to make all necessary and proper orders to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Except as provided under AS 21.24, delinquency proceedings under this chapter constitute the sole and exclusive method of liquidating, rehabilitating, reorganizing, or conserving an insurer, and a court may not entertain a petition for the commencement of the proceedings unless it has been filed in the name of the state on the relation of the director.

An appeal shall lie to the supreme court from an order granting or refusing rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation, and from every other order in delinquency proceedings having the character of a final order as to the particular portion of the proceedings embraced therein.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.78.020.
Commencement of delinquency proceedings.

A delinquency proceeding may not be commenced under this chapter unless commenced by the director. A court does not have jurisdiction to entertain, hear, or determine a delinquency proceeding commenced by a person other than the director.

The director shall commence the proceedings by application to the court for an order directing the insurer to show cause why the director should not have the relief requested. On the return of the order to show cause, and after a full hearing, the court shall either deny the application or grant the application, together with other relief that the nature of the case and the interest of the policyholders, creditors, stockholders, members, subscribers, or the public might require.

A court does not have jurisdiction to entertain, hear, or determine a complaint asking for an injunction or restraining order or other relief concerning the dissolution, liquidation, rehabilitation, sequestration, conservation, or receivership of an insurer, other than as provided under this chapter.

In addition to other grounds for jurisdiction provided by the laws of this state, a court having jurisdiction of the subject matter has jurisdiction over a person served under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable provisions of law in an action brought by the receiver of a domestic insurer or an alien insurer domiciled in this state if the person

served is obligated to the insurer in any way as an incident to an agency or brokerage arrangement that might exist or has existed between the insurer and the agent or broker, in an action on or incident to the obligation;

served is a reinsurer who has at any time written a policy of reinsurance for an insurer against which a rehabilitation or liquidation order is in effect when the action is commenced, or is an agent or broker of or for the reinsurer, in any action or incident related to the reinsurance contract; or

is or has been an officer, manager, trustee, organizer, promoter, or person in a position of comparable authority or influence in an insurer against which a rehabilitation or liquidation order is in effect when the action is commenced, in any action resulting from such a relationship with the insurer.

If the court, on motion of a party, finds that an action should, as a matter of substantial justice, be tried in a forum outside this state, the court may enter an appropriate order to stay further proceedings on the action in this state.

The court shall appoint the director as the receiver in all actions taken under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 59 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.030.
Injunctions and orders.

A receiver appointed in a proceeding under this chapter may at any time apply for, and a court may grant, a restraining order, preliminary or permanent injunction, or other order considered necessary to prevent

the transaction of further business;

the transfer of property;

interference with the receiver or with a proceeding under this chapter;

waste of the insurer’s assets;

dissipation and transfer of bank accounts;

the institution or further prosecution of any actions or proceedings;

the obtaining of preferences, judgments, attachments, garnishments, or liens against the insurer, its assets, or its policyholders;

the levying of execution against the insurer, its assets, or its policyholders;

the making of a sale or deed for nonpayment of taxes or assessments that would lessen the value of the assets of the insurer;

the withholding from the receiver of books, accounts, documents, or other records relating to the business of the insurer; or

any other threatened or contemplated action that might lessen the value of the insurer’s assets or prejudice the rights of policyholders, creditors, or shareholders, or the administration of a proceeding under this chapter.

The receiver may apply to a court outside of the state for the relief described in (a) of this section.

A bond may not be required of the director as a prerequisite to issuing an injunction or restraining order under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 60 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For effect of (c) of this section, as amended by § 60, ch. 50, SLA 1990, on the Rules of Court, see § 88, ch. 50, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 21.78.040.
Grounds for rehabilitation.

The director may apply to the court for an order appointing the director as receiver of and directing the director to rehabilitate a domestic insurer when the insurer

is impaired or insolvent;

has refused to submit any of its books, records, accounts, or affairs to reasonable examination by the director;

has concealed or wrongfully removed records or assets or otherwise violated AS

21.69.390

;

has failed to comply with an order of the director to make good an impairment of capital or surplus or both;

has transferred or attempted to transfer substantially its entire property or business, or has entered into a transaction the effect of which is to merge substantially its entire property or business in that of any other insurer without having first obtained the written approval of the director;

is found, after examination, to be in such condition that its further transaction of business will be hazardous to its policyholders, or to its creditors, or to its members, subscribers, or stockholders, or to the public;

has an officer, director, or manager who has refused to be examined under oath, concerning its affairs, for which purpose the director is authorized to conduct and to enforce by all appropriate and available means an examination under oath in another state or territory of the United States, in which the officer, director, or manager may then presently be, to the full extent permitted by the laws of the other state or territory, this special authorization considered;

has been or is the subject of an application for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, or sequestrator of the insurer or its property otherwise than under the provisions of this title, but only if the appointment has been made or is imminent and its effect is or would be to oust the courts of this state of jurisdiction;

has consented to such an order through a majority of its directors, stockholders, members, or subscribers;

has failed to pay a final judgment rendered against it in this state upon any insurance contract issued or assumed by it, within 30 days after the judgment became final or within 30 days after the time for taking an appeal has expired, or within 30 days after dismissal of an appeal before final termination, whichever date is the later;

has failed to remove a person who, in fact, has executive authority in the insurer, whether an officer, manager, general agent, employee, or other person, if the person has been found after notice and hearing by the director to be dishonest or untrustworthy in a way affecting the insurer’s business;

after demand by the director under AS

21.06.120

or under this chapter, has failed to promptly make available for examination its own property, books, accounts, documents, or other records, or those of a subsidiary or related company within the control of the insurer, or those of a person having executive authority in the insurer so far as they pertain to the insurer;

has, within the previous four years, wilfully violated its charter or articles of incorporation, its bylaws, an insurance law of this state, or a valid order of the director issued under this title;

has failed to file, within the time allowed by law, its annual report or other financial report required by statute and, after written demand by the director, has failed to give an immediate and adequate explanation; or

has reached an authorized control level event under AS

21.14.040

or a mandatory control level event under AS

21.14.050

.

The director may apply to the court for an order appointing the director as receiver of a domestic insurer, and directing the director to rehabilitate the insurer if

there is reasonable cause to believe that there has been embezzlement from the insurer, wrongful sequestration or diversion of the insurer’s assets, forgery or fraud affecting the insurer, or other illegal conduct in, by, or with respect to the insurer that, if established, would endanger assets in an amount threatening the solvency of the insurer;

control of the insurer, whether by stock ownership or otherwise, and whether direct or indirect, is in a person or persons found after notice and hearing to be untrustworthy;

a person who, in fact, has executive authority in the insurer, whether an officer, manager, general agent, director or trustee, employee, or other person, has refused to be examined under oath by the director concerning the insurer’s affairs, whether in this state or elsewhere, and after reasonable notice of the fact the insurer has failed to promptly and effectively terminate the employment and status of the person and the person’s influence on management.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 61, 62 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 76 SLA 1994)

Sec. 21.78.050.
Grounds for liquidation.

The director may apply to the court for an order appointing the director as receiver, if an appointment of the director as receiver is not then in effect, and directing the director to liquidate the business of a domestic insurer or of the United States branch of an alien insurer having trusteed assets in this state, regardless of whether or not there has been a prior order directing the director to rehabilitate the insurer, upon any of the grounds specified in AS

21.78.040

or if the insurer

has ceased transacting business for a period of one year; or

is an insolvent insurer and has commenced voluntary liquidation or dissolution, or attempts to commence or prosecute an action or proceeding to liquidate its business or affairs, or to dissolve its corporate charter, or to procure the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian or sequestrator under any law except this title.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 14 SLA 1991)

Sec. 21.78.060.
Grounds for conservation, foreign insurers.

The director may apply to the court for an order appointing the director as receiver or ancillary receiver, and directing the director to conserve the assets in this state, of a foreign insurer upon

any of the grounds specified in AS

21.78.040

or

21.78.050

; or

the ground that it’s property has been sequestrated in its domiciliary sovereignty or in any other sovereignty.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.070.
Grounds for conservation, alien insurers.

The director may apply to the court for an order appointing the director as receiver or ancillary receiver, and directing the director to conserve the assets within this state, of an alien insurer upon

any of the grounds specified in AS

21.78.040

or

21.78.050

;

the ground that the insurer has failed to comply, within the time designated by the director, with an order made by the director to make good an impairment of its trusteed funds; or

the ground that the property of the insurer has been sequestrated in its domiciliary sovereignty or elsewhere.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.080.
Grounds for ancillary liquidation.

The director may apply to the court for an order appointing the director as ancillary receiver of and directing the director to liquidate the business of a foreign insurer having assets, business, or claims in this state upon the appointment in the domiciliary state of the insurer of a receiver, liquidator, conservator, rehabilitator, or other officer by whatever name called for the purpose of liquidating the business of the insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.090.
Order of rehabilitation.

An order to rehabilitate a domestic insurer must require the director to take immediate possession of the property of the insurer and to conduct its business, and to take steps toward removal of the causes and conditions that have made rehabilitation necessary as the court may direct.

If at any time the director considers that further efforts to rehabilitate the insurer would be useless, the director may apply to the court for an order of liquidation.

The director, or an interested person upon due notice to the director, at any time may apply to the court for an order terminating the rehabilitation proceedings and permitting the insurer to resume possession of its property and the conduct of its business, but the order may not be made or entered except when, after a hearing, the court has determined that the purposes of the proceeding have been fully accomplished.

An order issued under this section must require an accounting to the court by the receiver. Accountings must be at the intervals that the court specifies in its order.

Entry of an order of rehabilitation does not constitute an anticipatory breach of contracts of the issuer.

A court in this state before which an action or proceeding is pending in which the insurer is a party or in which the insurer is obligated to defend a party shall stay the action or proceeding when a rehabilitation order against the insurer is entered. The stay shall be imposed for that period of time necessary for the receiver to obtain proper representation and prepare for further proceedings. The receiver shall take action respecting the pending litigation that the receiver considers necessary in the interests of justice and for the protection of creditors, policyholders, and the public. The receiver shall immediately consider all litigation pending outside this state and shall petition the courts having jurisdiction over that litigation for stays if necessary to protect the estate of the insurer.

A statute of limitations or defense of laches does not run with respect to an action by or against an insurer between the filing of a petition for appointment of a receiver for the insurer and the order granting or denying that petition. An action by or against the insurer that might have been commenced when the petition was filed may be commenced for at least 60 days after the order of rehabilitation is entered or the petition is denied.

A guaranty association or foreign guaranty association has standing to appear in a court proceeding concerning the rehabilitation of a domestic insurer if the association is or might become liable to act as a result of the rehabilitation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 63 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.100.
Order of liquidation, domestic insurers.

An order to liquidate the business of a domestic insurer must require the director to take immediate possession of the property of the insurer, to liquidate its business, to deal with the insurer’s property and business in the director’s name as director of insurance or in the name of the insurer, as the court may direct, and to give notice to all creditors who may have claims against the insurer to present the claims.

The director may apply for and secure an order dissolving the corporate existence of a domestic insurer upon the director’s application for an order of liquidation of the insurer or at any time after the order has been granted.

An order issued under this section must require an accounting to the court by the receiver. Accountings must be at the intervals that the court specifies in its order.

Policies, other than life or health insurance or annuities, in effect at the time of issuance of an order of liquidation continue in force only for the lesser of

a period of 30 days after the date of entry of the liquidation order;

the expiration of the policy coverage;

the date on which the insured replaces the insurance coverage with equivalent insurance in another insurer or otherwise terminates the policy; or

the date on which the receiver effects a transfer of the policy obligation to a solvent assuming insurer.

For purposes of any other provision of law, an order of liquidation terminates policy coverage at the time specified in (d) of this section.

A policy of life or health insurance, or annuities, in effect at the time an order of liquidation is issued, continues in force for the period and under the terms provided for by an applicable guaranty association or foreign guaranty association.

A policy of life or health insurance, or annuities, and any period of coverage not covered by a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association terminates as provided in (d) and (e) of this section.

Upon issuance of an order appointing a receiver of a domestic insurer or of an alien insurer domiciled in this state, an action may not be brought against the insurer or receiver, whether in this state or elsewhere, and an existing action may not be maintained or further presented after issuance of an order. A court of this state shall give full faith and credit to an injunction against the receiver or the company, or against the continuation of an existing action against the receiver or the company, if an injunction is included in an order to liquidate an insurer that is issued under corresponding provisions in another state. If, in the receiver’s judgment, protection of the estate of the insurer necessitates intervention in an action against the insurer that is pending outside this state, the receiver may intervene in the action. The receiver may defend an action in which the receiver intervenes under this section at the expense of the estate of the insurer.

The receiver may, within two years after an order for liquidation, or within the additional time that applicable law permits, institute an action or proceeding on behalf of the estate of the insurer if the period of limitation applicable to the action or proceeding fixed by law has not expired at the time of the filing of the petition upon which the liquidation order is entered. If, by agreement, a period of limitation is fixed for instituting a suit or proceeding upon a claim, or for filing a claim, proof of claim, proof of loss, demand, or notice, or if in a judicial or other proceeding a period of limitation is fixed, either in the proceeding or by applicable law, for taking an action, filing a claim or pleading, or doing an act, and if the period had not expired as of the date of the filing of the petition for liquidation, the receiver may, for the benefit of the estate, take an action or do an act, required of or permitted to the insurer, within a period of 180 days after the entry of an order for liquidation, or within a longer period that is shown to the satisfaction of the court not to be unfairly prejudicial to the other party.

A statute of limitations or defense of laches does not run with respect to an action against an insurer between the filing of a petition for liquidation against an insurer and the denial of the petition. An action against the insurer that might have been commenced when the petition was filed may be commenced for at least 60 days after the petition is denied.

A guaranty association or foreign guaranty association has standing to appear in a court proceeding concerning the liquidation of an insurer if the association is, or might become, liable to act as a result of the liquidation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 64 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 31 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, in (f) and (g), “life or health” was substituted for “life, health” to correct a manifest error in ch. 50, SLA 1990.

Cross references. —

For effect of (h) of this section on the Rules of Court, see § 89, ch. 50, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 21.78.110.
Order of liquidation, alien insurers.

An order to liquidate the business of a United States branch of an alien insurer having trusteed assets in this state shall be in the same terms as those prescribed for domestic insurers, except that the assets of the business of the United States branch shall be the only assets included in the order.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.120.
Order of conservation or ancillary liquidation of foreign or alien insurers.

An order to conserve the assets of a foreign or alien insurer must require the director to take immediate possession of the property of the insurer in this state and to conserve it, subject to the further direction of the court.

An order to liquidate the assets in this state of a foreign insurer must require the director to take immediate possession of the property of the insurer in this state and to liquidate it subject to the orders of the court and with due regard to the rights and powers of the domiciliary receiver, as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.130.
Conduct of delinquency proceedings against domestic and alien insurers.

When under this chapter a receiver is to be appointed in delinquency proceeding for a domestic or alien insurer, the court shall appoint the director as the receiver. The court shall order the director immediately to take possession of the assets of the insurer and to administer the assets under orders of the court.

As a domiciliary receiver, the director shall be vested by operation of law with the title to all of the property, contracts, and rights of action, and all of the books and records of the insurer, wherever located, as of the date of entry of the order directing the director to rehabilitate or liquidate a domestic insurer or to liquidate the United States branch of an alien insurer domiciled in this state, and the director shall have the right to recover the same and reduce the same to possession; except that ancillary receivers in reciprocal states shall have, as to assets located in their respective states, the rights and powers that are herein prescribed for ancillary receivers appointed in this state as to assets located in this state.

The filing or recording of the order directing possession to be taken, or a certified copy of the order, in any office where instruments affecting title to property are required to be filed or recorded shall impart the same notice as would be imparted by a deed, bill of sale, or other evidence of title duly filed or recorded.

The director as domiciliary receiver shall be responsible for the proper administration of all assets coming into the possession or control of the director. The court may at any time require a bond from the director or a deputy of the director if considered desirable for the protection of the assets.

Upon taking possession of the assets of an insurer, the domiciliary receiver shall, subject to the direction of the court, immediately proceed to conduct the business of the insurer or to take steps authorized by this chapter for the purpose of rehabilitating, liquidating, or conserving the affairs or assets of the insurer.

In connection with delinquency proceedings, the director may appoint one or more special deputies and the director may employ counsel, clerks, and assistants that the director considers necessary. The compensation of the special deputies, counsel, clerks, or assistants and all expenses of taking possession of the insurer and of conducting the proceedings shall be fixed by the receiver, subject to the approval of the court, and shall be paid out of the funds or assets of the insurer. Within the limits of duties imposed upon them, special deputies shall possess all the powers given to, and in the exercise of those powers shall be subject to all of the duties imposed upon, the receiver with respect to the proceedings.

If it appears to the receiver that there has been a violation of civil or criminal law, or breach of a contractual or fiduciary obligation detrimental to the insurer by an officer, manager, insurance producer, employee, or other person, the receiver may pursue all appropriate legal remedies on behalf of the insurer.

If the receiver determines that reorganization, consolidation, conversion, reinsurance, merger, or other transformation of the insurer is appropriate, the receiver shall prepare a plan to implement the changes. Upon application of the receiver for approval of the plan, and after the notice and hearings that the court prescribes, the court may either approve or disapprove the plan proposed or may modify it and approve it as modified. A plan approved under this section must be, in the judgment of the court, fair and equitable to all parties concerned. If the plan is approved, the receiver shall carry out the plan. In the case of a life insurer, the plan proposed may include the imposition of liens upon the policies of the company, if all rights of shareholders are first relinquished. A plan for a life insurer may also propose imposition of a moratorium upon loan and cash surrender rights under policies, for the period, and to the extent, considered necessary.

If the property of the insurer does not contain sufficient cash or liquid assets to defray the costs incurred, the director may advance the costs incurred out of an appropriation to the division for that purpose. Amounts advanced for expenses of administration must be repaid to the state out of the first available money of the insurer.

The receiver may

hold hearings, subpoena witnesses to compel their attendance, administer oaths, examine a person under oath, and compel a person to subscribe to the person’s testimony after it has been correctly reduced to writing, and may require the production of books, papers, records, or other documents that the receiver determines are relevant to the inquiry;

remove records and property of the insurer to the offices of the director or to another place that is convenient for the purposes of efficient and orderly execution of the liquidation; a guaranty association or a foreign guaranty association shall be allowed reasonable access to the records of the insurer that is necessary for the association to carry out its statutory obligations;

intervene in a proceeding, wherever instituted, that might lead to the appointment of a receiver or trustee, and may act as the receiver or trustee if the appointment is offered;

enter into agreements with a receiver or commissioner of another state relating to the rehabilitation, liquidation, conservation, or dissolution of an insurer doing business in both this state and the other state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 65 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 100 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For effect of (j)(3) of this section on the Rules of Court, see § 90, ch. 50, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 21.78.140.
Conduct of delinquency proceedings against foreign insurers.

When under this chapter an ancillary receiver is to be appointed in delinquency proceedings for an insurer not domiciled in this state, the court shall appoint the director as ancillary receiver. The director shall file a petition requesting the appointment on the grounds set out in AS

21.78.080

,

upon a finding that there are sufficient assets of the insurer located in this state to justify the appointment of an ancillary receiver; or

if 10 or more persons resident in this state having claims against the insurer file a petition with the director requesting the appointment of the ancillary receiver.

The domiciliary receiver for the purpose of liquidating an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state shall be vested by operation of law with the title to all of the property, contracts, and rights of action, and all of the books and records of the insurer located in this state, and has the immediate right to recover balances due from local agents and to obtain possession of any books and records of the insurer found in this state. The domiciliary receiver shall also be entitled to recover the other assets of the insurer located in this state, except that upon the appointment of an ancillary receiver in this state, the ancillary receiver shall during the ancillary receivership proceedings have the sole right to recover the other assets. The ancillary receiver shall, as soon as practicable, liquidate from their respective securities those special deposit claims and secured claims that are proved and allowed in the ancillary proceedings in this state, and shall pay the necessary expenses of the proceedings. The ancillary receiver shall promptly transfer all remaining assets to the domiciliary receiver. Subject to these provisions, the ancillary receiver and deputies of the receiver shall have the same powers and be subject to the same duties with respect to the administration of the assets as a receiver of an insurer domiciled in this state.

The domiciliary receiver of an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state may sue in this state to recover assets of the insurer to which the domiciliary receiver may be entitled under the laws of this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.150.
Claims of nonresidents against domestic insurers.

In a delinquency proceeding begun in this state against a domestic insurer, claimants residing in reciprocal states may file claims either with the ancillary receivers, if any, in their respective states, or with the domiciliary receiver. The claims must be filed on or before the last date fixed for the filing of claims in the domiciliary delinquency proceedings.

Controverted claims belonging to claimants residing in reciprocal states may either

be proved in this state; or

if ancillary proceedings have been commenced in the reciprocal states, be proved in those proceedings; if a claimant elects to prove the claim in ancillary proceedings, if notice of the claim and opportunity to appeal and be heard is afforded the domiciliary receiver of this state, as provided in AS

21.78.160

with respect to ancillary proceedings in this state, the final allowance of the claim by the courts in the ancillary state shall be accepted in this state as conclusive as to its amount and its priority, if any, against special deposits or other security located in the ancillary state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.160.
Claims against foreign insurers.

In a delinquency proceeding in a reciprocal state against an insurer domiciled in that state, claimants against the insurer who reside in this state may file claims either with the ancillary receiver, if any, appointed in this state, or with the domiciliary receiver. The claims must be filed on or before the last date fixed for the filing of claims in the domiciliary delinquency proceedings.

Controverted claims belonging to claimants residing in this state may either

be proved in the domiciliary state as provided by the law of that state; or

if ancillary proceedings have been commenced in this state, be proved in those proceedings; in the event that a claimant elects to prove the claim in this state, the claimant shall file the claim with the ancillary receiver and shall give notice in writing to the receiver in the domiciliary state, either by registered mail or by personal service at least 40 days before the date set for hearing; the notice must contain a concise statement of the amount of the claim, the facts on which the claim is based, and the priorities asserted, if any; if the domiciliary receiver within 30 days after the giving of notice gives notice in writing to the ancillary receiver and to the claimant, either by registered mail or by personal service, of intention to contest the claim, the domiciliary receiver shall be entitled to appear or to be represented in any proceeding in this state involving adjudication of the claim; the final allowance of the claim by the courts of this state shall be accepted as conclusive as to its amount and its priority, if any, against special deposits or other security located in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.78.170.
Form of claim.

All claims against an insurer against which delinquency proceedings have been begun must set out in reasonable detail the amount of the claim, or the basis upon which the amount can be ascertained, the facts upon which the claim is based, and the priorities asserted, if any. The claims shall be verified by the affidavit of the claimant, or someone authorized to act on behalf of the claimant and having knowledge of the facts, and shall be supported by documents that may be material to the claims.

All claims filed in this state shall be filed with the receiver, whether domiciliary or ancillary, in this state, on or before the last date of filing as specified in this chapter.

If a claim is denied in whole or in part by the receiver, written notice of the determination shall be given to the claimant or the claimant’s attorney by first class mail at the address shown in the proof of claim. An objection by the claimant must be filed with the receiver within 60 days after the date of mailing of the notice. If an objection is not filed, the claimant may not object to the determination.

If an objection is filed with the receiver and the receiver does not alter the denial of the claim as a result of the objection, the receiver shall ask the court for a hearing as soon as practicable and give notice of the hearing by first class mail to the claimant or the claimant’s attorney and to any other person directly affected, not less than 10 nor more than 30 days before the date of the hearing.

A claim need not be considered or allowed if it does not contain all the information in (a) of this section that might be applicable. The receiver may require that a prescribed form be used and may require that other information and documents be included.

At any time, the receiver may request the claimant to present information or evidence supplementary to that required under (a) of this section, and may take testimony under oath, require production of affidavits or depositions, or otherwise obtain additional information or evidence.

A judgment or order against an insured or the insurer entered after the date of filing of a successful petition for liquidation, and a judgment or order against an insured or the insurer entered at any time by default or by collusion, need not be considered as evidence of liability or the amount of damages. A judgment or order against an insured or the insurer entered within the four months before the filing of the petition need not be considered evidence of liability or of the amount of damages.

A claim of a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association shall be in the form and contain the substantiation agreed to by the association and the receiver.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 66 — 68 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.180.
Priority of certain claims.

In a delinquency proceeding against an insurer domiciled in this state, claims owing to residents of ancillary states shall be preferred claims if like claims are preferred under the laws of this state. Claims owing to residents or nonresidents shall be given equal priority of payment from general assets regardless of where the assets are located.

In a delinquency proceeding against an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state, claims owing to residents of this state shall be preferred if like claims are preferred by the laws of that state.

The owners of special deposit claims against an insurer for which a receiver is appointed in this or any other state shall be given priority against their several special deposits in accordance with the provisions of the statutes governing the creation and maintenance of the deposits. If there is a deficiency in a deposit so that the claims secured by it are not fully discharged from it, the claimants may share in the general assets, but the sharing shall be deferred until general creditors and also claimants against other special deposits who have received smaller percentages from their respective special deposits, have been paid percentages of their claims equal to the percentage paid from the special deposit.

The determination of the value of a security held by a secured creditor shall be under the supervision and control of the court, with due regard for recommendations made by the receiver. The value determined must be credited upon the secured claim, and a deficiency must be treated as an unsecured claim. If the claimant surrenders the security to the receiver, the entire claim shall be allowed as if unsecured. The value of a security held by a secured creditor must be determined in one of the following ways, as the court directs:

by converting the security into money according to the terms of the agreement under which the security was delivered to the creditor; or

by agreement, arbitration, compromise, or litigation between the creditor and the receiver.

If a creditor, whose claim against an insurer is secured in whole or in part by the undertaking of another person, fails to prove and file that claim, the other person may do so in the creditor’s name, and is subrogated to the rights of the creditor, whether the claim was filed by the creditor or by the other person in the creditor’s name, to the extent that the other person discharges the undertaking. In the absence of an agreement with the creditor, the other person is not entitled to a distribution until the amount paid to the creditor on the undertaking plus the distributions paid on the claim from the insurer’s estate to the creditor equals the amount of the entire claim of the creditor. Any excess received by the creditor shall be held by the creditor in trust for the other person. In this subsection, “other person” does not include a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 69, 70 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.78.190.
Attachment and garnishment of assets.

During the pendency of delinquency proceedings in this or a reciprocal state, an action or proceeding in the nature of an attachment, garnishment, or execution may not be commenced or maintained in the courts of this state against the delinquent insurer or its assets.
A lien obtained for the action or proceeding within four months before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding or at any time thereafter shall be void as against any rights arising in the delinquency proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)